Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Chapter 36

Tennessee Tobacco Farmers Certifying Board [Repealed]

43-36-101. [Repealed.]

Acts 1999, ch. 175, § 2; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 503, § 2, effective February 28, 2014.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 43, ch. 36, §§ 43-36-101 — 43-36-110, concerned the Tennessee tobacco farmers certifying board.

Acts 2014, ch. 503, § 3 provided that notwithstanding § 4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the Tennessee tobacco farmers certifying board, created by § 43-36-102, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon February 28, 2014.

43-36-102. [Repealed.]

Acts 1999, ch. 175, § 3; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 503, § 2, effective February 28, 2014.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 43, ch. 36, §§ 43-36-101 — 43-36-110, concerned the Tennessee tobacco farmers certifying board.

Acts 2014, ch. 503, § 3 provided that notwithstanding § 4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the Tennessee tobacco farmers certifying board, created by § 43-36-102, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon February 28, 2014.

43-36-103. [Repealed.]

Acts 1999, ch. 175, § 4; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 503, § 2, effective February 28, 2014.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 43, ch. 36, §§ 43-36-101 — 43-36-110, concerned the Tennessee tobacco farmers certifying board.

Acts 2014, ch. 503, § 3 provided that notwithstanding § 4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the Tennessee tobacco farmers certifying board, created by § 43-36-102, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon February 28, 2014.

43-36-104. [Repealed.]

Acts 1999, ch. 175, § 5; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 503, § 2, effective February 28, 2014.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 43, ch. 36, §§ 43-36-101 — 43-36-110, concerned the Tennessee tobacco farmers certifying board.

Acts 2014, ch. 503, § 3 provided that notwithstanding § 4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the Tennessee tobacco farmers certifying board, created by § 43-36-102, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon February 28, 2014.

43-36-105. [Repealed.]

Acts 1999, ch. 175, § 6; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 503, § 2, effective February 28, 2014.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 43, ch. 36, §§ 43-36-101 — 43-36-110, concerned the Tennessee tobacco farmers certifying board.

Acts 2014, ch. 503, § 3 provided that notwithstanding § 4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the Tennessee tobacco farmers certifying board, created by § 43-36-102, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon February 28, 2014.

43-36-106. [Repealed.]

Acts 1999, ch. 175, § 7; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 503, § 2, effective February 28, 2014.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 43, ch. 36, §§ 43-36-101 — 43-36-110, concerned the Tennessee tobacco farmers certifying board.

Acts 2014, ch. 503, § 3 provided that notwithstanding § 4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the Tennessee tobacco farmers certifying board, created by § 43-36-102, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon February 28, 2014.

43-36-107. [Repealed.]

Acts 1999, ch. 175, § 8; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 503, § 2, effective February 28, 2014.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 43, ch. 36, §§ 43-36-101 — 43-36-110, concerned the Tennessee tobacco farmers certifying board.

Acts 2014, ch. 503, § 3 provided that notwithstanding § 4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the Tennessee tobacco farmers certifying board, created by § 43-36-102, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon February 28, 2014.

43-36-108. [Repealed.]

Acts 1999, ch. 175, § 9; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 503, § 2, effective February 28, 2014.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 43, ch. 36, §§ 43-36-101 — 43-36-110, concerned the Tennessee tobacco farmers certifying board.

Acts 2014, ch. 503, § 3 provided that notwithstanding § 4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the Tennessee tobacco farmers certifying board, created by § 43-36-102, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon February 28, 2014.

43-36-109. [Repealed.]

Acts 1999, ch. 175, § 10; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 503, § 2, effective February 28, 2014.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 43, ch. 36, §§ 43-36-101 — 43-36-110, concerned the Tennessee tobacco farmers certifying board.

Acts 2014, ch. 503, § 3 provided that notwithstanding § 4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the Tennessee tobacco farmers certifying board, created by § 43-36-102, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon February 28, 2014.

43-36-110. [Repealed.]

Acts 1999, ch. 175, § 11; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 503, § 2, effective February 28, 2014.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 43, ch. 36, §§ 43-36-101 — 43-36-110, concerned the Tennessee tobacco farmers certifying board.

Acts 2014, ch. 503, § 3 provided that notwithstanding § 4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the Tennessee tobacco farmers certifying board, created by § 43-36-102, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon February 28, 2014.